Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
PART 8
PLAIN LANGUAGE IN STATE LAWS

2-2-801. Plain language requirement in state laws.

Any person, including members of the general assembly and employees of each house of the general assembly, the office of legislative legal services, the legislative council staff, and the staff of the joint budget committee, shall ensure that, to the extent possible, all bills and amendments to bills prepared or proposed by such person are written in plain, nontechnical language and in a clear and coherent manner using words with common and everyday meaning which are understandable to the average reader. Enactment of a bill by the general assembly shall create a presumption that such bill conforms to this section.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire part added, p. 995, § 2, effective June 2.

2-2-802. People first language in state laws.

On or after August 11, 2010, all new or amended statutes that refer to persons with disabilities must:

Avoid language that:

Implies that a person as a whole is disabled, such as the "mentally ill" or the "learning disabled"; or

Equates persons with their condition, such as "epileptics", "autistics", or "quadriplegics";

Replace disrespectful language by referring to persons with disabilities as persons first. Examples of people first language include, but are not limited to, the following: Persons with disabilities, persons with developmental and intellectual disabilities, persons with behavioral or mental health disorders, and persons with autism.

Replace disrespectful, insensitive, or outdated terms such as "mental retardation" with people first language such as "people with developmental and intellectual disabilities".

Violation of this section shall not be grounds to invalidate any new or amended statute; however, such statutes shall be amended to reflect the provisions of this section in any subsequent revision.

Nothing in this section shall constitute a requirement to change the name of any department, agency, or program of the state or any political subdivision of the state.

The revisor of statutes is authorized to change any disrespectful, insensitive, or outdated terms that appear in the Colorado Revised Statutes and to replace such terms with people first language in accordance with this section.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1137), ch. 93, p. 319, § 1, effective August 11.

L. 2017:

IP(1), (1)(b), and (1)(c) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1262, § 30, effective May 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

2-2-803. Inclusion of tribal governments - definition.

As used in this section, "local government entities" includes an authority, county, municipality, city and county, district, or other political subdivision of the state; any institution, department, agency, or authority of any of the foregoing; and any other entity, organization, or corporation formed by an intergovernmental agreement or other contract between or among any of the foregoing.

On and after August 10, 2022, new or amended state statutes that enumerate or define local government entities that are eligible for or included in state grant or benefit programs must also designate tribal nations with jurisdiction in Colorado as eligible entities, if legal and appropriate given the nature and funding source of the program.

A violation of this section is not grounds to invalidate a new or amended statute; however, the statute shall be amended to reflect the provisions of this section in any subsequent revision.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (SB 22-104), ch. 218, p. 1431, § 1, effective August 10.